Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

35-1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Public Safety.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety.

“Department” means the Department of Public Safety.

35-1-2.
Examination of sexual assault victims; reports.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Division” means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

“Medical examination” means an examination pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 16-6-1 or subsection (c) of Code Section 16-6-2.

When a forensic medical examination is performed, evidence is collected, and the alleged victim has requested that law enforcement officials be notified, the individual performing such exam, or his or her designee, shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency of the collection of such evidence and provide a summary of all rights guaranteed to the alleged victim pursuant to the Crime Victims’ Bill of Rights established pursuant to Code Section 17-17-1, et seq., as provided by the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council. At the time of the examination, no alleged victim shall be required to assign or waive any rights afforded to him or her in the Crime Victims’ Bill of Rights or that might prevent the alleged victim from seeking relief from the Crime Victims Compensation Board. Law enforcement officials shall take possession of such evidence no later than 96 hours of being notified.

It shall be the duty of every law enforcement officer who takes possession of the evidence as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section to ensure that such evidence is submitted to the division within 30 days of it being collected, in accordance with the procedures established by the division.

When a forensic medical examination was performed before July 1, 2016, evidence was collected, and the alleged victim requested that law enforcement officials be notified, the individual who performed such exam, or his or her designee, shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency of the collection of such evidence on or before July 15, 2016, and law enforcement officials shall take possession of such evidence on or before July 31, 2016. It shall be the duty of every law enforcement officer who takes possession of the evidence as provided in this Code section to ensure that such evidence is submitted to the division by August 31, 2016, in accordance with the procedures established by the division.

It shall be the duty of every law enforcement agency to create a list of evidence resulting from a forensic medical examination that is in such agency’s possession on August 1, 2016, identifying such evidence as needing to be tested and submitting such listing of information to the division by August 15, 2016.

A failure to comply with the provisions of this Code section shall not affect the admissibility of evidence collected from a forensic medical examination.

Beginning December 1, 2016, the division shall issue an annual report detailing the number of cases for which it has tested evidence pursuant to this Code section and the number of cases that are awaiting testing. Such report shall be provided to the executive counsel of the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Lieutenant Governor, the members of the House Committee on Judiciary, Non-civil, the members of the Senate Judiciary Committee, the House Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Senate Health and Human Services Committee and posted online at the Georgia Bureau of Investigation’s website.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 145, § 2/SB 304; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 35/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “afforded to him or her” for “afforded to them” near the end of subsection (b); and substituted “Senate Judiciary Committee” for “Senate Judiciary, Non-civil Committee” in the middle of the second sentence of subsection (g).

Cross references.

Sexual assault protocol, T. 15, C. 24.

Sexual offense, T. 16, C. 6.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 35-1-2, pertaining to passenger motor vehicle for warden of Georgia State Prison, was repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2007. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 13; Ga. L. 1952, p. 3, § 1.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 145, § 1/SB 304, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Compassionate Care for Victims of Sexual Assault Act.’ ”

35-1-3.
Subsistence allowance for law enforcement officers.

The governing authorities of the several counties, municipal corporations, and other political subdivisions of this state are authorized to designate and set apart a portion of the compensation, whether payable on a salary or fee basis, to sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, patrolmen, policemen, and other law enforcement officers, as a subsistence allowance, which allowance shall not exceed $5.00 for each day actually spent by such sheriff or other law enforcement officer in the performance of his duties.

Nothing in this Code section shall affect any pension system which was being operated by any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision of this state on March 9, 1956, nor shall this Code section affect any rights of any person under any pension system which was being operated by any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision on March 9, 1956.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 741, §§ 1, 3.

Editor’s notes.

By a 1963 resolution (Ga. L. 1963, p. 316), the General Assembly ratified an executive order of the Governor dated March 9, 1962, which suspended until the convening of the 1963 Session of the General Assembly any income taxes due the state attributable to the inclusion in gross income of amounts received as subsistence allowances in accordance with this Code section.

35-1-4.
Requirements for reporting stolen motor vehicles and license plates; notice to owner upon recovery; rules and regulations; failure of law enforcement officer to report; effect on Georgia Crime Information Center.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Recovering agency” means the law enforcement agency which recovers a motor vehicle which has previously been reported stolen.

“Reporting agency” means the law enforcement agency which receives a report that a motor vehicle has been stolen or lost and which reports such theft or loss to the Georgia Crime Information Center.

It shall be the duty of every law enforcement officer who receives a report based on reliable information that any motor vehicle has been stolen or that the license plate for such vehicle has been stolen or lost to report the theft or loss to the Georgia Crime Information Center immediately after receiving such information, unless prior thereto information has been received of the recovery of the vehicle or plate. It shall be the duty of any person who reports the theft of a motor vehicle to provide the law enforcement agency to which the report of theft was made and the Georgia Crime Information Center with a means of contacting the owner of the stolen motor vehicle or the successor in interest to such owner in the event of the recovery of the motor vehicle. Any law enforcement officer, upon receiving information of the recovery of any motor vehicle or license plate which has previously been reported as stolen or lost, shall immediately report the recovery of the motor vehicle or plate directly to the Georgia Crime Information Center. It shall be the duty of the reporting law enforcement agency, the agency to which the vehicle was first reported stolen, to notify the owner or the successor in interest to the owner within 72 hours when a previously reported stolen motor vehicle has been recovered, or within 72 hours after the reporting agency has received notification of recovery if recovery is by another agency. The owner or successor in interest shall not be charged or otherwise incur any storage fee on the recovered stolen motor vehicle until the expiration of at least 24 hours immediately following such notification to the owner or the successor in interest. In the event the reporting agency is different from the recovering agency, the recovering agency shall contact the reporting agency and provide all information required by the guidelines established by the Georgia Crime Information Center and any other relevant information. In all cases, it shall remain the responsibility of the reporting agency to notify the owner or the successor in interest to the owner. This requirement shall be included in the rules and regulations of the board promulgated pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section. If, after a reasonable attempt, the reporting law enforcement agency is unable to contact the owner or the successor in interest to the owner, a record of such fact shall be made and filed with the incident reports and posted in the record required to be maintained by Code Section 17-5-50.

The board is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to the submission of the reports provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section. Such rules and regulations shall include time limits for the submission of the reports and the forms upon which the reports shall be submitted.

The intentional failure of any law enforcement officer to submit reports as prescribed in subsection (b) of this Code section or the failure to do so through wanton neglect shall constitute cause for removal from office, if the officer is elected, or shall be grounds for dismissal if the officer is a nonelected employee.

The provisions of this Code section shall not be construed to affect the responsibilities of the Georgia Crime Information Center as provided by paragraph (14) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-3-33.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 733, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 632, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1991, p. 723, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35; Ga. L. 1993, p. 762, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 35/HB 942.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding duty of peace officer to report theft of motor vehicle, §

40-3-5

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “that a motor vehicle” was substituted for “that motor vehicle” in paragraph (a)(2) and “subsection (c)” was substituted for “subsection (b)” in the next-to-last sentence in subsection (b).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “submission” was substituted for “submissions” in the first sentence of subsection (c).

35-1-5.
Unauthorized use of wavelength of radio system adopted by department or Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person, firm, or corporation to use the same wavelength of the radio system adopted by the department without the prior written authorization of the commissioner or to do any act interfering with the proper receipt or transmission of information relating to the department or any division thereof.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person, firm, or corporation to use the same wavelength of the radio system adopted by the Georgia Bureau of Investigation without the prior written authorization of the director or to do any act interfering with the proper receipt or transmission of information relating to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 995, § 1.

Cross references.

Protection of public property generally, §§

50-16-4

,

50-16-14

et seq.

35-1-6.
Appointment of nonuniformed investigators; salaries; status; assignment; powers.

The commissioner is authorized to appoint five nonuniformed investigators who shall be certified peace officers pursuant to Chapter 8 of this title, the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.” The commissioner shall determine the salaries of such investigators. The investigators shall be in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2 and therefore shall not be governed by any rules of position, classification, appointment, promotion, demotion, transfer, dismissal, qualification, compensation, seniority privileges, tenure, or other such matters concerning their employment as may now or hereafter be established by the State Personnel Board or any successor boards or agencies. The investigators shall be assigned to the Internal Affairs Section of the Department of Public Safety in the office of the commissioner at the department’s headquarters complex.

The investigators shall have full arrest powers in cases involving internal affairs and in such cases shall be authorized:

To investigate crimes committed anywhere in the state;

To arrest any person violating the criminal laws of this state;

To serve and execute warrants after notifying the law enforcement agency of the local jurisdiction of the intent to serve such warrant or warrants;

To enforce in general the criminal laws of this state; and

To carry firearms while performing their duties.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1450, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3131, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-46/HB 642.

Cross references.

Offenses involving illegal aliens, §

16-11-200

et seq.

Determination of immigration status of suspects, §

17-5-100

.

Protection of public property generally, §§

50-16-4

,

50-16-14

et seq.

Secure and verifiable identity document, §

50-36-2

.

Immigration enforcement review board, §

50-36-3

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-1-7.
Liability of law enforcement officers performing duties at the scene of an emergency.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Emergency” means an occurrence involving, or appearing to involve, a clear and imminent danger or threat to life, health, or property, including, but not limited to, the rescuing of a person or pet from a locked vehicle when such person or pet remaining within such vehicle presents a clear and imminent danger to such person’s or pet’s life or health.

“Law enforcement officer” means any peace officer who is employed by this state or any political subdivision thereof and who is required by the terms of his or her employment, whether by election or appointment, to give his or her full time to the preservation of public order or the protection of life and property or the prevention of crime. Such term shall include sheriffs and deputy sheriffs.

“Pet” means any domesticated animal normally maintained in or near the household of its owner.

A law enforcement officer shall not be liable at law for any action or actions done while performing any duty at the scene of an emergency except for gross negligence, willful or wanton misconduct, or malfeasance.

History.

Code 1933, § 3-1004.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 655, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 292, § 1/SB 31.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “A law enforcement officer shall not be liable at law for any action or actions done while performing any duty at the scene of an emergency except for gross negligence, willful or wanton misconduct, or malfeasance. As used in this Code section, the term ‘law enforcement officer’ means any peace officer who is employed by this state or any political subdivision thereof and who is required by the terms of his employment, whether by election or appointment, to give his full time to the preservation of public order or the protection of life and property or the prevention of crime. Such term shall include sheriffs and deputy sheriffs.”

Cross references.

Immunity of state and political subdivisions and employees, agents, and representatives thereof for injury or damage arising from emergency management activities, §

38-3-35

.

Liability of persons rendering emergency care, § 51-1-29.

Liability of members of fire departments for acts performed while fighting fires or performed at scenes of emergencies, § 51-1-30.

Immunity for operators of external defibrillators, § 51-1-29.3.

Limitation on health care liability claims for gross negligence in emergency medical care, § 51-1-29.5.

Law reviews.

For survey article citing developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

For comment, “Good Samaritan Laws — Legal Disarray: An Update,” see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 1439 (1987).

For article, “Georgia’s Public Duty Doctrine: The Supreme Court Held Hostage,” see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (1999).

35-1-8.
Acquisition, collection, classification, and preservation of information assisting in identifying deceased persons and locating missing persons.

It shall be the duty of every law enforcement agency to:

Acquire, collect, classify, and preserve any information which would assist in the identification of any deceased individual who has not been identified after the discovery of such deceased individual;

Acquire, collect, classify, and preserve immediately any information which would assist in the location of any missing person, including any minor, and provide confirmation as to any entry for such a person to the parent, legal guardian, or next of kin of that person and the agency shall acquire, collect, classify, and preserve such information from such parent, guardian, or next of kin;

Exchange such records and information as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection with other law enforcement agencies of this state, any other state, or the United States. With respect to missing minors, such information shall be transmitted immediately to other law enforcement agencies; and

Report any case of an unusual illness, health condition, or death, or an unusual cluster of such events, or any other suspicious health related event to the Department of Public Health and the appropriate county board of health.

For purposes of this subsection, “facility” means a facility pursuant to Chapter 3, 4, or 7 of Title 37, relating to treatment of mentally ill, developmentally disabled, and alcoholic or drug dependent persons, or an institution classified as a nursing home pursuant to Code Section 31-7-1.

A person hospitalized or resident in a facility shall be considered to be a missing person at the time such person’s unaccounted for absence from that facility is reported by that facility, either by telephone or in writing, to a law enforcement agency.

Any law enforcement agency which receives a report that a person who has Alzheimer’s disease or other mental illness involving dementia is missing shall immediately open an investigation for the purpose of determining such person’s whereabouts; and no policy for applying any waiting period prior to initiation of a missing persons investigation shall apply in the case of a person who has Alzheimer’s disease or other mental illnesses involving dementia.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 690, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1128, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 35; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1504, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, § 10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-4, 3-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Disposition of unclaimed dead bodies, § 31-21-20 et seq.

Prohibition on minimum waiting periods for initiating missing person report, §

35-1-18

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “subsection” was substituted for “Code section” in paragraph (a)(3) and “Chapter” was substituted for “Chapters” in paragraph (b)(1).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, subsection (d) as enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, §
10 was redesignated as paragraph (a)(4), “and” was deleted from the end of paragraph (a)(2) and “; and” was substituted for a period at the end of (a)(3).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

35-1-9.
Utilization of alarm verification required.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Alarm monitoring company” means any person, company, corporation, partnership, business, or a representative or agency thereof authorized to provide alarm monitoring services for burglar alarm systems, fire alarm systems, or other similar electronic security systems whether such systems are maintained on commercial business property, public property, or individual residential property.

“Alarm verification” means a reasonable attempt by an alarm monitoring company to contact the alarm site or alarm user, by telephone or other electronic means, to determine whether a burglar alarm signal is valid prior to requesting law enforcement to be dispatched to the location and, where the initial attempted contact cannot be made, a second reasonable attempt to make such contact utilizing a different telephone number or electronic address or number.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, an alarm monitoring company shall utilize a system providing for alarm verification of all alarm signals.

Alarm verification shall not be required in the case of a fire alarm or a panic or robbery-in-progress alarm or in cases where a crime-in-progress has been verified to be true by video or audible means.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 750, § 1/HB 59.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the prohibition of inspecting or copying records of law enforcement agency for commercial solicitation and was based on Ga. L. 1999, p. 1868, § 1. The former Code section was repealed by Ga. L. 1999, p. 809, § 2, effective July 1, 1999.

35-1-10.
Training in investigation of family violence incidents.

The Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council and the Georgia Public Safety Training Center shall establish guidelines and procedures for the incorporation of training materials and information in:

Methods for identifying, combating, and reporting family violence incidents; and

Methods for identifying and reporting sexual offenses and assisting victims of sexual offenses.

The guidelines and procedures listed in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be for use by law enforcement training centers monitored by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council and monitored and funded by the Georgia Public Safety Training Center in all courses for which they have responsibility and oversight.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2939, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 986, § 1.

35-1-11.
Police volunteers for traffic control; training required.

An elected sheriff or police chief of a local law enforcement agency or fire chief of a local fire department, with the approval of the local governing authority, shall be authorized to designate, equip, and train nonsworn law enforcement employees and firefighters and volunteers to assist in traffic control, provided that such individuals have successfully completed at least one hour of a traffic control training program approved by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council. With the approval of the sheriff or police chief of a local law enforcement agency or fire chief of a local fire department, such individuals shall be authorized to direct and regulate the flow of traffic. Any such individual who is not certified pursuant to the requirements of Chapter 8 of this title shall not have the power of arrest provided to peace officers.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 654, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 302, § 2-2/HB 459.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “A police chief of a local law enforcement agency with the approval of the local governing authority shall be authorized to designate and equip police volunteers and to provide training to such police volunteers in the area and manner of traffic control. With the approval of the police chief of a local law enforcement agency or fire chief of a local fire department, a police volunteer shall be authorized to direct and regulate the flow of traffic in the event of a fire, explosion, hurricane, tornado, or other emergency situation. A police volunteer shall not have the power of arrest provided to peace officers.”

Cross references.

Obedience to authorized persons directing traffic, §

40-6-2

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, Code Section 35-1-11 as enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 777, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 35-1-12.

35-1-12.
Chief of police or law enforcement head; exception.

Any county, municipality, or other public subdivision of this state which has a law enforcement agency shall declare a chief of police or a law enforcement head for such law enforcement agency who is required to be a certified peace officer pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 8 of this title, known as the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.” The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to sheriffs.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 777, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, Code Section 35-1-11 as enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 777, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 35-1-12.

35-1-13.
Completion and transmission of reports from victims of identity fraud.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any law enforcement agency that receives a report from a resident of this state that such person has been the victim of identity fraud shall prepare an incident report and transmit the same to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation identity fraud repository, as provided in Code Section 16-9-123, notwithstanding the fact that such person’s identity may have been used solely to commit one or more criminal offenses beyond the jurisdiction of this state. Copies of such incident reports shall be referred from the office of the Attorney General to the Georgia Crime Information Center as provided in Chapter 3 of this title and to any jurisdiction in which such identity has been used.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 551, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 25/SB 148.

Cross references.

Identity fraud, §

16-9-120

et seq.

Fraudulent driver’s license or identification card, §

40-5-125

.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 enactment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 81 (2002).

For article, “The Growing Threat of Identity Theft and Its Implications for Employers,” see 11 Ga. St. B. J. 27 (2006).

35-1-14.
Written policies for emergency pursuits.

On and after January 1, 2004, each state, county, and local law enforcement agency that conducts emergency response and vehicular pursuits shall adopt written policies that set forth the manner in which these operations shall be conducted. Each law enforcement agency may create its own such policies or adopt an existing model. All pursuit policies created or adopted by any law enforcement agency must address situations in which police pursuits cross over into other jurisdictions. Law enforcement agencies which do not comply with the requirements of this Code section are subject to the withholding of any state funding or state administered federal funding.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 911, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 35/SB 465.

Cross references.

Operation of ambulances and ambulance services generally, T. 31, C. 11.

Authorized emergency vehicles, §

40-6-6

.

Yielding of right of way to authorized emergency vehicles, §

40-6-74

.

Duty of pedestrians to yield right of way to authorized emergency vehicles, §

40-6-99

.

Equipment of law enforcement and emergency vehicles, §

40-8-90

et seq.

35-1-15.
Fresh pursuit by law enforcement officers; authority and responsibilities of officers; applicability.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Fresh pursuit” means pursuit by a law enforcement officer of a person who is in immediate and continuous flight from the commission of a criminal offense.

“Law enforcement officer” means a person employed or appointed by a state or political subdivision who is granted, by state law, the authority to enforce criminal, traffic, or penal laws of his or her respective state and who possesses the power to effect arrests.

A law enforcement officer from Alabama, Florida, North Carolina, South Carolina, or Tennessee who enters this state in fresh pursuit of a person shall have the same authority to arrest and hold in custody such person within this state as that of a law enforcement officer of this state; provided, however, that the authority granted by this Code section shall be limited to criminal offenses of the pursuing state that also are criminal offenses under the laws of this state and that are punishable by death or imprisonment in excess of one year under the laws of the pursuing state.

When an arrest is made in this state by a law enforcement officer of another state pursuant to this Code section, the law enforcement officer shall, without unnecessary delay, take the person arrested before a judicial officer of this state.

The judicial officer shall conduct a hearing for the limited purpose of determining whether such arrest meets the requirements of this Code section unless the person arrested executes a written waiver of his or her right to a hearing under this Code section. If the judicial officer determines that such arrest was unlawful, he or she shall discharge such person arrested. If the judicial officer determines that such arrest was lawful, he or she shall commit such person arrested to imprisonment as provided in Code Section 17-13-35. Once such person is imprisoned pursuant to this Code section, the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 17 shall govern the extradition and return of such person to the state in which the criminal offense was committed.

This Code section shall apply only to a law enforcement officer from Alabama, Florida, North Carolina, South Carolina, or Tennessee where the state in which the law enforcement officer is employed or appointed has enacted a provision similar to this Code section relating to the arrest and custody of a person pursued into a neighboring state.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 157, § 1/HB 983; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 35/SB 46.

35-1-16.
Training law enforcement officers investigating crimes involving trafficking persons for labor or sexual servitude.

The Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council and the Georgia Public Safety Training Center shall establish guidelines and procedures for the incorporation of training materials and information in:

Methods for identifying, combating, and reporting incidents where a person has been trafficked for labor or sexual servitude, as such terms are defined in Code Section 16-5-46;

Methods for providing proper detention facilities or alternatives to detention facilities for persons who have been trafficked for labor or sexual servitude, as such terms are defined in Code Section 16-5-46, including providing information on therapeutic facilities for such persons; and

Methods for assisting persons who have been trafficked for labor or sexual servitude, as such terms are defined in Code Section 16-5-46, including providing information on social service organizations available to assist such person.

The guidelines and procedures listed in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be for use by law enforcement training centers monitored by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council and monitored and funded by the Georgia Public Safety Training Center in all courses for which they have responsibility and oversight.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 217, § 8/HB 200.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011,
Code Section 35-1-16, as enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 9/HB 87,
was redesignated as Code Section 35-1-17.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 enactment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 131 (2011).

35-1-17.
Local law enforcement agencies to enter into agreements with federal agencies for the enforcement of immigration laws.

Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to encourage Georgia law enforcement officials to work in conjunction with federal immigration authorities and to utilize all resources made available by the federal government to assist state and local law enforcement officers in the enforcement of the immigration laws of this state and of the United States.

Cooperation with federal authorities.

To the extent authorized by federal law, state and local government employees, including law enforcement officers and prosecuting attorneys, shall be authorized to send, receive, and maintain information relating to the immigration status of any individual as reasonably needed for public safety purposes. Except as provided by federal law, such employees shall not be prohibited from receiving or maintaining information relating to the immigration status of any individual or sending or exchanging such information with other federal, state, or local governmental entities or employees for official public safety purposes.

State and local agencies shall be authorized to enter into memorandums of understanding and agreements with the United States Department of Justice, the Department of Homeland Security, or any other federal agency for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration and customs laws and the detention, removal, and investigation of illegal aliens and the immigration status of any person in this state. A peace officer acting within the scope of his or her authority under any such memorandum of understanding, agreement, or other authorization from the federal government shall have the power to arrest, with probable cause, any person suspected of being an illegal alien.

Except as provided by federal law, no state or local agency or department shall be prohibited from utilizing available federal resources, including data bases, equipment, grant funds, training, or participation in incentive programs for any public safety purpose related to the enforcement of state and federal immigration laws.

When reasonably possible, applicable state agencies shall consider incentive programs and grant funding for the purpose of assisting and encouraging state and local agencies and departments to enter into agreements with federal entities and to utilize federal resources consistent with the provisions of this Code section.

Authority to transport illegal aliens. If a state or local law enforcement officer has verification that a person is an illegal alien, then such officer shall be authorized to securely transport such illegal alien to a federal facility in this state or to any other temporary point of detention and to reasonably detain such illegal alien when authorized by federal law. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to hinder or prevent a peace officer or law enforcement agency from arresting or detaining any criminal suspect on other criminal charges.

Authority to arrest illegal aliens. When authorized by federal law, a state or local law enforcement officer shall be authorized to arrest any person based on such person’s status as an illegal alien or for a violation of any federal immigration law.

Immunity. A law enforcement officer or government official or employee, acting in good faith to enforce immigration laws pursuant to an agreement with federal authorities to collect or share immigration status information, or to carry out any provision of this Code section, shall have immunity from damages or liability from such actions.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 9/HB 87; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 35/HB 942; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 35/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, added “Legislative intent.” at the beginning of subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011,
Code Section 35-1-16, as enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 9/HB 87,
was redesignated as Code Section 35-1-17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability, and provides, in part, that: “(b) The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

“(c)
The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the enactment of this Code section shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Immigration Detention Reform:
No Band Aid Desired,” see 60 Emory L. J. 1211 (2011).

For article on the 2011 enactment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 35 (2011).

For article, “State Government:
Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 51 (2011).

35-1-18.
Prohibition on minimum waiting periods for initiating missing person report.

No law enforcement agency shall implement a policy or practice which mandates a minimum waiting period before initiating a missing person report with such agency; provided, however, that it shall remain within the discretion of the law enforcement agency to determine what action, if any, is required in response to such a report.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 2/SB 23.

Cross references.

Kidnapping, §

16-5-40

.

Immediate investigation for missing person with Alzheimer’s disease, §

35-1-8

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014,
Code Section 35-1-18, as enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 742, § 1/HB 845,
was redesignated as Code Section 35-1-19.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 5/SB 23, approved by the Governor on April 24, 2014, provided that the effective date of this Code section is July 1, 2013.
See Op. Atty Gen. No. 76-76 for construction of effective date provisions that precede the date of approval by the Governor.